src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Nouns
!  ========


LEXICON Nouns
        Preposition ;

LEXICON Preposition
bi+Pr+:bi       Prepmark ;
               Article ;

LEXICON Prepmark
@U.CASE.GEN@ Article ;

LEXICON Article
al+Art+:al Articlemark ;
          Stems ;

LEXICON Articlemark
@U.ART.PRESENT@ Stems ;

LEXICON Tag
+N: Case ;

LEXICON Case
+Def+Nom:u     MarkNOM ;
+Def+Acc:a     MarkACC ;
+Def+Gen:i     MarkGEN ;
@U.ART.ABSENT@ IndefCase ;

LEXICON IndefCase
+Indef+Nom:uN MarkNOM ;
+Indef+Acc:aN MarkACC ;
+Indef+Gen:iN MarkGEN ;

LEXICON MarkNOM
@U.CASE.NOM@ # ;

LEXICON MarkACC
@U.CASE.ACC@ # ;

LEXICON MarkGEN
@U.CASE.GEN@ # ;
